West Virginia, session 2025, SB280.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 18. Education. ARTICLE 9H. DISPLAY OF NATIONAL MOTTO. §18-9H-1. Display of the National Motto in public schools. (a) A public elementary or secondary school shall display in a conspicuous location within a common area of the main building of the school that is accessible to the public, and may also display in a similar location in common areas of in other buildings of the school, a durable poster or framed copy of the United States national motto, "In God We Trust”: Provided, That the poster or framed copy of the national motto described in this section is a minimum of 8.5 by 11 inches, and shall contain a representation of the United States flag centered under the national motto and may not depict any other words, images, or other information.(b) A public elementary or secondary school may accept and use private donations for the purposes of meeting the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. No public funds may be used for this purpose. (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of code to the contrary, this section applies to public charter schools authorized pursuant to §18-5G-1 et seq. CHAPTER 18b. hIGHER EDUCATION. ARTICLE 14. MISCELLANEOUS. §18B-14-12. Display of the National Motto in institutions of higher education. (a) A state institution of higher education, as defined by §18B-1-2 of this code, shall display in a conspicuous location within a common area of the main building of the institution of higher education that is accessible to the public, and may also display in a similar location in common areas of other buildings of the institution of higher education, a durable poster or framed copy of the United States national motto, "In God We Trust”: Provided, That the poster or framed copy of the national motto described in this section is a minimum of 8.5 by 11 inches, and shall contain a representation of the United States flag centered under the national motto and may not depict any other words, images, or other information.(b) An institution of higher education may accept and use private donations for the purposes of meeting the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. No public funds may be used for this purpose.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home